Louisiana, session 2026, HB1092.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 18:106(C)(2)(c), 564(D)(1)(a)(iii) and (2)(a)(iii), 1303(I)(1)(b), and
1309.3(D)(1)(a)(iii) are hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
Page 1 of 16
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1092 ENROLLED
§106. Physical disability; inability to write English; language minority groups;
execution of documents; assistance
* * *
C.
* * *
(2) For purposes of this Subsection proof of disability means one of the
following:
* * *
(c) A copy of current documentation showing eligibility for social security
disability benefits, veteran's disability benefits, paratransit services, benefits from the
office for citizens with developmental disabilities of intellectual and developmental
disability supports, or benefits from Louisiana Rehabilitation Services.
* * *
§564. Assistance in voting on election day
* * *
D.(1)(a) Prior to receiving assistance pursuant to this Section due to a
disability, including visual impairment, the voter shall file with the registrar in
person or by mail a statement setting forth the necessity and reasons for this
assistance and shall furnish the registrar one of the following:
* * *
(iii) A copy of current documentation showing eligibility for social security
disability benefits, veteran's disability benefits, paratransit services, benefits from the
office for citizens with developmental disabilities of intellectual and developmental
disability supports, or benefits from Louisiana Rehabilitation Services.
* * *
(2)(a) A voter shall also be entitled to assistance without having filed with
the registrar a statement setting forth the necessity and reasons for this assistance if,
on election day, the voter presents to the commissioner-in-charge one of the
following as proof of disability:
* * *
Page 2 of 16
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1092 ENROLLED
(iii) A copy of current documentation showing eligibility for social security
disability benefits, veteran's disability benefits, paratransit services, benefits from the
office for citizens with developmental disabilities of intellectual and developmental
disability supports, or benefits from Louisiana Rehabilitation Services.
* * *
§1303. Persons entitled to vote in compliance with this Chapter
* * *
I. Voters with disabilities. (1) Any qualified voter who submits any of the
following to the registrar of voters may vote absentee by mail upon meeting the
requirements of this Chapter:
* * *
(b) A copy of current documentation showing eligibility for social security
disability benefits, veteran's disability benefits, paratransit services, benefits from the
office for citizens with developmental disabilities of intellectual and developmental
disability supports, or benefits from Louisiana Rehabilitation Services.
* * *
§1309.3. Assistance in voting during early voting
* * *
D.(1)(a) Prior to receiving assistance pursuant to this Section because of a
disability, including visual impairment, the voter shall file with the registrar in
person or by mail a statement setting forth the necessity and reasons for this
assistance and shall furnish the registrar one of the following:
* * *
(iii) A copy of current documentation showing eligibility for social security
disability benefits, veteran's disability benefits, paratransit services, benefits from the
office for citizens with developmental disabilities of intellectual and developmental
disability supports, or benefits from Louisiana Rehabilitation Services.
* * *
Page 3 of 16
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1092 ENROLLED
Section 2. R.S. 28:451.1(D) and (F)(1), 451.2(3) and (19), 451.3(B), 451.4(section
heading), 454.1(A), 470(D)(2), 621(A), 771(B)(5)(b), 826(B)(1) and (2)(b), (C)(1)(a) and
(c), and 917(A) are hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§451.1. Title; purpose; intent
* * *
D. It is the intent of this Chapter to establish that the office for citizens with
developmental disabilities of intellectual and developmental disability supports
within the Louisiana Department of Health will be responsible for the programmatic
leadership in the designing and developing of all developmental disabilities services
provided by the department either directly or pursuant to agreements with public and
private providers. It is also the intent of this Chapter to enable the office to provide
developmental disabilities services and supports consistent with the rights and
principles within this Chapter, to the extent possible.
* * *
F. This law shall be made available in alternative formats upon request from
the following:
(1) Office for citizens with developmental disabilities of intellectual and
developmental disability supports.
* * *
§451.2. Definitions
As used in this Chapter, the following words, terms, and phrases shall have
the meaning ascribed to them in this Section, except when the context clearly
indicates a different meaning:
* * *
(3) "Assistant secretary" means the assistant secretary of the office for
citizens with developmental disabilities of intellectual and developmental disability
supports of the Louisiana Department of Health.
* * *
Page 4 of 16
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1092 ENROLLED
(19) "Office" or "OCDD" "OIDDS" means the office for citizens with
developmental disabilities of intellectual and developmental disability supports
within the Louisiana Department of Health.
* * *
§451.3. Administration of the provisions of this Chapter; responsibilities of human
services authorities and districts; advisory committees
* * *
B. The assistant secretary of the office for citizens with developmental
disabilities of intellectual and developmental disability supports shall be the
administrative head of the office and shall be fully responsible for the administration
of the office, its administrative units, and the establishment of all programmatic
policies for services and supports for persons with developmental disabilities and
their families delivered under the auspices of the department.
* * *
§451.4. State developmental centers; office for citizens with developmental
disabilities of intellectual and developmental disability supports
* * *
§454.1. Developmental disabilities services system
A. The office for citizens with developmental disabilities of intellectual and
developmental disability supports shall establish a developmental disabilities
services and supports system and shall serve as the single point of entry into the
system. The services and supports noted in the definition of developmental
disabilities services in this Chapter are not intended to reflect all services that may
be provided.
* * *
§470. Louisiana State Interagency Coordinating Council for EarlySteps: Louisiana's
Early Intervention Program for Infants and Toddlers with Disabilities and
Their Families
* * *
Page 5 of 16
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1092 ENROLLED
D.
* * *
(2) The council shall use funds provided pursuant to this Chapter to hire an
executive director who shall be responsible to and report directly to the council and
the secretary of the Louisiana Department of Health to carry out its functions
pursuant to this Chapter. The executive director shall be hired as an unclassified
employee of the Louisiana Department of Health, office for citizens with
developmental disabilities of intellectual and developmental disability supports. The
executive director shall provide administrative support to the state interagency
council and shall act as a resource to the state interagency coordinating council
regarding the EarlySteps Program. The council may also use funds provided
pursuant to this Chapter to obtain the services of other such professional, technical,
and clerical personnel as may be necessary to carry out its functions as provided in
this Chapter.
* * *
§621. Pilot programs for children with developmental disabilities who are
considered at-risk juveniles
A. The office for citizens with developmental disabilities of intellectual and
developmental disability supports, Louisiana Department of Health, may provide for
the establishment of pilot programs for children with developmental disabilities who
are considered at-risk juveniles. The pilot programs may provide developmental
disabilities services including assessment, counseling, and structured activities and
living options, both as defined in this Title for juveniles referred by other agencies
including but not limited to juvenile courts, the office of children and family
services, and the office of juvenile justice. The pilot programs shall be operated in
cooperation with other offices of the Louisiana Department of Health, the
Department of Children and Family Services, and the Department of Public Safety
and Corrections.
* * *
Page 6 of 16
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1092 ENROLLED
§771. Office of behavioral health; functions regarding substance-related and
addictive disorders
* * *
B. The office shall additionally have the following duties and
responsibilities:
* * *
(5)
* * *
(b) The copayment provided for in this Paragraph shall be deposited in the
state treasury pursuant to R.S. 39:82 and shall be accounted for by the commissioner
of administration through appropriations control pursuant to R.S. 39:334(B)(6). The
commissioner of administration shall establish a separate cost center in the office of
behavioral health and the office for citizens with developmental disabilities of
intellectual and developmental disability supports for revenue generated pursuant to
this Paragraph. All funds not obligated shall revert to the state general fund at the
end of the fiscal year.
* * *
§826. Disability Services Fund
* * *
B.(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, after
compliance with the requirements of Article VII, Section 9(B) of the Constitution of
Louisiana relative to the Bond Security and Redemption Fund, and after a sufficient
amount is allocated from that fund to pay all of the obligations secured by the full
faith and credit of the state which become due and payable within any fiscal year, the
treasurer shall deposit into the fund an amount equal to the amount collected by the
state attributable to the sale or lease of all or part of any movable and immovable
property previously operated by the office for citizens with developmental
disabilities of intellectual and developmental disability supports within the Louisiana
Department of Health, the proceeds of the fee assessed pursuant to the provisions of
Page 7 of 16
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1092 ENROLLED
R.S. 40:1046(H)(8)(a), and the proceeds of the taxes levied pursuant to R.S.
47:9105(A) and (B).
(2)
* * *
(b) The state treasurer shall deposit monies attributable to the collections by
the state for the sale or lease of all or part of any movable and immovable property
previously operated by the office for citizens with developmental disabilities of
intellectual and developmental disability supports within the Louisiana Department
of Health into a separate account within the fund.
* * *
C.(1) The legislature shall appropriate monies from the separate accounts of
the fund as follows:
(a) The account containing the monies attributable to the collections by the
state for the sale or lease of all or part of any movable and immovable property
previously operated by the office for citizens with developmental disabilities of
intellectual and developmental disability supports within the Louisiana Department
of Health shall be used solely to improve the capacity of the state to meet the varying
and complex needs of individuals with developmental disabilities, with emphasis on
increasing the number of recipients of waiver services.
* * *
(c) The account containing the monies attributable to one-half of the
proceeds of the fee assessed pursuant to the provisions of R.S. 40:1046(H)(8)(a) and
the proceeds of the taxes levied pursuant to R.S. 47:9105(A) and (B) shall be used
solely to support and enhance developmental disabilities services within the
Medicaid program or the office for citizens with developmental disabilities of
intellectual and developmental disability supports, or its successor.
* * *
§917. Human Services Interagency Council; membership and responsibilities
A. There shall be a human services interagency council established by the
department to provide policy guidance to the department in the ongoing operations
Page 8 of 16
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1092 ENROLLED
of the districts and authorities. The council shall be chaired by the secretary of the
department or his designee and shall include the assistant secretaries of the office of
behavioral health, office for citizens with developmental disabilities of intellectual
and developmental disability supports, office of public health, office of aging and
adult services, as well as the director of Medicaid or his designee, the executive
directors of the districts and authorities, and other members as deemed appropriate
by the council.
* * *
Section 3. R.S. 36:251(C)(1) and 258(D) are hereby amended and reenacted to read
as follows:
§251. Louisiana Department of Health; creation; domicile; composition;
purpose and functions
* * *
C.(1) The Louisiana Department of Health shall be composed of the
executive office of the secretary, the office of the surgeon general, the office of
management and finance, the office of public health, the office of behavioral health,
the office for citizens with developmental disabilities of intellectual and
developmental disability supports, the office of aging and adult services, the office
on women's health and community health, and such other offices as shall be created
by law.
* * *
§258. Offices; purposes and functions
* * *
D. The office for citizens with developmental disabilities of intellectual and
developmental disability supports shall be responsible for the programs and
functions of the state relating to the care, training, treatment, and education of
persons with intellectual disabilities, persons with developmental disabilities, and
persons with autism. It shall administer residential and day care facilities of the state
for persons with intellectual disabilities and persons with developmental disabilities.
* * *
Page 9 of 16
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1092 ENROLLED
Section 4. R.S. 37:1021, 1023(A), and 1025(A)(2) are hereby amended and
reenacted to read as follows:
§1021. Applicability
This Part shall apply only to the office for citizens with developmental
disabilities of intellectual and developmental disability supports and the office of
aging and adult services of the Louisiana Department of Health, to community
homes for persons with developmental disabilities funded through the Louisiana
Department of Health, to intermediate care facilities for people with developmental
disabilities, and to in-home Medicaid home- and community-based services. This
Part shall apply to any program or agency contracting for services with the Louisiana
Department of Health or the Department of Children and Family Services.
Participation on the part of private providers that contract with the Louisiana
Department of Health or the Department of Children and Family Services is strictly
voluntary.
* * *
§1023. Drug administration course; certification of medication attendants; rules;
instructor training courses; fees
A. Drug administration courses shall be established by the office of the
secretary of the Louisiana Department of Health in conjunction with the Louisiana
State Board of Nursing and the Louisiana State Board of Practical Nurse Examiners
and as approved by the secretary of the Louisiana Department of Health. Persons
who have successfully completed the course and passed a qualifying examination
shall be permitted to administer certain medications to residents of facilities operated
by the office for citizens with developmental disabilities of intellectual and
developmental disability supports or community homes for persons with
developmental disabilities funded through the Louisiana Department of Health or the
Department of Children and Family Services and to persons receiving in-home
Medicaid home- and community-based services and shall be known as medication
attendants. The course shall include but not be limited to instruction of the legal
aspects, roles, and responsibilities of drug administration, definitions, terminology,
Page 10 of 16
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1092 ENROLLED
classification, measurement, identification, effects, distribution, and the care and
handling of drugs.
* * *
§1025. Qualifications of applicants to the drug administration course
A. Each person accepted to participate in the drug administration course
shall be:
* * *
(2) Employed in a facility operated by the office for citizens with
developmental disabilities of intellectual and developmental disability supports, in
a community home for persons with developmental disabilities funded through the
Louisiana Department of Health or the Department of Children and Family Services,
or in an intermediate care facility for people with developmental disabilities, or be
a person who provides in-home Medicaid home- and community-based services.
* * *
Section 5. R.S. 40:1159.9(A)(2), 1249.3(A)(3), 2018.7(C)(3)(g),
2018.8(B)(introductory paragraph) and (14), 2020(A)(1) through (3) and (B)(introductory
paragraph) and (3), 2116(C)(1)(c), and 2180.3 are hereby amended and reenacted to read as
follows:
§1159.9. Consent to surgical or medical treatment for persons with developmental
disabilities and residents of state-operated nursing homes
A. Upon the written recommendation of the treating physician, the following
persons may consent to any surgical or medical treatment on behalf of any person
with a developmental disability who is a recipient of service from a state-operated
supported living program or home- and community-based service provider, or who
is a resident of a state-operated residential facility, community, or group home for
persons with developmental disabilities, state-supervised extended family living
program, or a nonstate-operated residential facility, community, or group home for
persons with developmental disabilities, or who is a resident of a state-operated
nursing home:
* * *
Page 11 of 16
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1092 ENROLLED
(2) For a resident of a state-supervised extended family living program, or
a recipient of service from a state-operated supported living program or home- and
community-based service provider, the office for citizens with developmental
disabilities of intellectual and developmental disability supports administrator or
manager with administrative authority over the extended family living program,
supported living program, or home- and community-based service provider for the
region where the home is located or the program or service is being provided.
* * *
§1249.3. Medical assistance programs
A. The department shall adopt rules and regulations in accordance with the
Administrative Procedure Act with regards to the following:
* * *
(3) Changing the policy on the allocation of waiver slots so that the office
for citizens with developmental disabilities of intellectual and developmental
disability supports and the office of aging and adult services may allocate all Centers
for Medicare and Medicaid Services-approved waivers, such as Children's Choice,
Supports, Residential Options Options, and Adult Day Health Care, based upon
individual need and cost-effectiveness, as long as individual needs are met with the
alternative waivers.
* * *
§2018.7. Palliative Care Interdisciplinary Advisory Council; creation; purpose;
termination
* * *
C.
* * *
(3) The council may engage and solicit, as necessary, input,
recommendations, and guidance pertaining to palliative care from interested parties
and stakeholders including but not limited to the following:
* * *
Page 12 of 16
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1092 ENROLLED
(g) The office for citizens with developmental disabilities of the department
of intellectual and developmental disability supports.
* * *
§2018.8. Alzheimer's and Related Dementias Advisory Council; composition;
purpose
* * *
B. The council shall consist of the following twenty-two members:
* * *
(14) The assistant secretary of the office of citizens with developmental
disabilities of intellectual and developmental disability supports or his designee.
* * *
§2020. Review of deaths of persons served by the Louisiana Department of Health
A. The legislature finds that:
(1) In accordance with best practices and national trends, it is recommended
that the Louisiana Department of Health through the office for citizens with
developmental disabilities of intellectual and developmental disability supports, the
office of behavioral health, and the office of aging and adult services monitor and
review deaths of persons receiving services through the offices.
(2) Collection of data on the causes and circumstances of death of these
persons will enable the office for citizens with developmental disabilities of
intellectual and developmental disability supports, the office of behavioral health,
and the office of aging and adult services to initiate quality improvement and
provider remediation in long-term care services in order to reduce mortality rates.
(3) A complete review of the information obtained by the office for citizens
with developmental disabilities of intellectual and developmental disability supports,
the office of behavioral health, and the office of aging and adult services will enable
the offices to identify patterns and systemic problems to support corrective actions
and quality improvements in service delivery.
Page 13 of 16
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1092 ENROLLED
B. For the purposes of this Section, the following terms shall have the
following meanings:
* * *
(3) "Office" means the office for citizens with developmental disabilities of
intellectual and developmental disability supports, the office of behavioral health,
or the office of aging and adult services within the Louisiana Department of Health.
* * *
§2116. Facility need review
* * *
C.(1) The secretary of the Louisiana Department of Health shall appoint a
facility need review committee, "FNR committee", that shall consist of the following
members:
* * *
(c) The assistant secretary of the office for citizens with developmental
disabilities of intellectual and developmental disability supports of the Louisiana
Department of Health or his designee.
* * *
§2180.3. Input from the office for citizens with developmental disabilities of
intellectual and developmental disability supports
Any office, bureau, or agency that licenses ICF/DD's shall prepare proposed
rules, regulations, and standards in consultation with the office for citizens with
developmental disabilities of intellectual and developmental disability supports.
Such consultation will include assurance that all federal and state laws and
regulations, including the provisions of this Chapter regarding program
requirements, are included in the licensing requirements.
Section 6. R.S. 46:1301(A)(introductory paragraph) and (1), 2352(F)(3), and
2605(B)(13) are hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
Page 14 of 16
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1092 ENROLLED
§1301. Services to autistic persons; center of excellence for autism spectrum
disorder; responsibility
A. The Louisiana Department of Health shall be is responsible for providing
services to autistic persons, with the exception of those delineated by Part I of
Chapter 8 of Title 17 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950 and provided for by
the Department of Education or the local school board or otherwise mandated by law
to be provided by the Department of Education or the local school board. The
Louisiana Department of Health shall be responsible for:
(1) The establishment of a center of excellence for autism spectrum disorder
within the office for citizens with developmental disabilities of intellectual and
developmental disability supports. This center may be operated by the office
through formal agreements with the Department of Education and other appropriate
public and private agencies including but not limited to Louisiana State University
Health Sciences Center-New Orleans, Louisiana State University Health Sciences
Center-Shreveport, and St. Mary's Residential Training School in Alexandria, or
others. This center should be the core of activities providing services to autistic
citizens including but not limited to early diagnosis and intervention and
individualized programs involving school, home, and community throughout the life
span of autistic citizens. The center shall give assistance to private and public
agencies providing services to autistic citizens and their families. The center shall
become a resource and training facility for educators and others charged with
educating autistic citizens. The center, as well as any facilities constructed as a part
of the center upon the appropriation of funds, shall be located in Caddo Parish.
* * *
§2352. Creation; board membership; terms; compensation
* * *
F. Upon request of the board, the directors of the following agencies shall
make themselves available for consultation and shall provide information regarding
the services available to the deaf through their respective agencies:
* * *
Page 15 of 16
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1092 ENROLLED
(3) The Louisiana Department of Health, office for citizens with
developmental disabilities of intellectual and developmental disability supports.
* * *
§2605. Children's Cabinet Advisory Board
* * *
B. The advisory board shall be composed of the following members:
* * *
(13) The assistant secretary of the office for citizens with developmental
disabilities of intellectual and developmental disability supports of the Louisiana
Department of Health or his designee.
* * *
Section 7. The Louisiana State Law Institute is hereby authorized and requested to
change all references in the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950 from the office for citizens
with developmental disabilities to the office of intellectual and developmental disability
supports and "OCDD" to "OIDDS".
Section 8. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 16 of 16
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.